Hawaii statutes.
§431:10F-102 Fiduciary bonds, expense.
Any fiduciary required by law to give bonds, may include, as part of the
fiduciary's lawful expense to be allowed by the court or official by whom the
fiduciary was appointed, the reasonable amount paid as premium for the bonds to
the surety insurer who issued or guaranteed the bonds. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next